Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2833
Pharmacist in charge, defined.

Pharmacist in charge means a pharmacist who is designated on a pharmacy license or a remote dispensing pharmacy license or designated by a hospital as being responsible for the practice of pharmacy in the pharmacy for which a pharmacy license or a remote dispensing pharmacy license is issued or in a hospital pharmacy and who works within the physical confines of such pharmacy or hospital pharmacy, except that the pharmacist in charge is not required to work within the physical confines of a remote dispensing pharmacy unless otherwise required by law.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 929;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 37;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 69.